Maryland, session 2025, HB0178.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Transportation
21–101.
(a) In this title and Title 25 of this article the following words have the meanings
indicated.
(c) “Bicycle path” means any travelway designed and designated by signing or
signing and marking for bicycle use, located within its own right–of–way or in a shared
right–of–way, and physically separated from motor vehicle traffic by berm, shoulder, curb,
or other similar device.
(e) “Bike lane” means any portion of a roadway or shoulder designated for single
directional bicycle flow.
21–1003.
(a) The provisions of this section apply except as necessary to avoid conflict with
other traffic or in compliance with law or the directions of a police officer or traffic control
device.
(ff) (1) A person convicted of a violation of subsection (j) of this section while
operating a commercial motor vehicle in Anne Arundel County is subject to:
(i) For a first offense, a fine of $100;
(ii) For a second offense, a fine of $250; and
(iii) For a third or subsequent offense, a fine of $500.
(2) A person convicted of a violation of subsection (u) or (dd) of this section
is subject to a fine of $25.
(3) A DRIVER OF A MOTOR VEHICLE IS SUBJECT TO A CIVIL PENALTY
NOT EXCEEDING $500 FOR A VIOLATION OF SUBSECTION (GG) OF THIS SECTION.
(GG) (1) THIS SUBSECTION DOES NOT APPLY TO:
(I) AN AUTHORIZED EMERGENCY VEHICLE;
(II) A TRANSIT VEHICLE;

HOUSE BILL 178 3
(III) A VEHICLE PICKING UP OR DISCHARGING INDIVIDUALS
WITH DISABILITIES;
(IV) A VEHICLE THAT HAS BECOME UNINTENTIONALLY SO
DISABLED WHILE ON THE HIGHWAY THAT THE DRIVER CANNOT AVOID STOPPING
AND TEMPORARILY STANDING OR PARKING THE VEHICLE; OR
(V) A VEHICLE WHILE LOADING OR UNLOADING GOODS FOR
PICK–UP OR DELIVERY:
1. A. UNLESS A SHORTER PERIOD OF TIME IS
IMPOSED UNDER A LOCAL LAW, FOR A PERIOD OF TIME NOT EXCEEDING 30
MINUTES; AND
B. THAT IS DISPLAYING FLASHING HAZARD WARNING
LIGHTS; OR
2. UNDER A LOCAL CURBSIDE PARKING PERMIT.
(2) A PERSON MAY NOT STOP, STAND, OR PARK A VEHICLE IN A BIKE
LANE OR BICYCLE PATH.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.